Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1207
Possession of a
defaced firearm; penalty.

(1) Any person who knowingly
possesses, receives, sells, or leases, other than by delivery to law enforcement
officials, any firearm from which the manufacturer's identification mark or
serial number has been removed, defaced, altered, or destroyed, commits the
offense of possession of a defaced firearm.

(2) Possession of a defaced firearm is a Class III felony.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 239;

Laws 2009, LB63, § 16.

This section is held not to be invalid as in conflict with Neb. Const. art. I, section 1. State v. Comeau, 233 Neb. 907, 448 N.W.2d 595 (1989).